Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 6. Manager Plan.

Sec. 29.20.460.
Manager plan.

A municipality may adopt a manager plan of government. Adoption of a manager plan may be initiated either by petition or by motion adopted by the governing body.

A petition for the adoption of a manager plan shall meet the requirements of AS

29.26.110

—

29.26.160

except, instead of containing an ordinance or resolution, the application submitted under AS

29.26.110(a)

must contain the question of whether a manager plan for the municipality should be adopted and material required under AS

29.26.120(a)(1)

and (2) shall be replaced with the same question.

If the clerk certifies under AS

29.26.140

that a petition is sufficient, the petition shall be submitted to the governing body.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 4 ch 80 SLA 1989)

Sec. 29.20.470.
Election on adoption of manager plan.

The governing body shall provide by ordinance or resolution for a vote on the question of adopting a manager plan at the next election when it

receives a petition to submit the question to the voters that has been certified as sufficient by the clerk; or

adopts a motion to submit the question to the voters.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 5 ch 80 SLA 1989)

Sec. 29.20.480.
Adoption of manager plan.

If a manager plan is approved, the governing body shall, within 60 days, adopt the plan by ordinance or resolution.

The governing body shall notify the department of the adoption of a manager plan.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.20.490.
Appointment of manager.

The governing body shall appoint a manager by a majority vote of its membership. A manager is chosen on the basis of administrative qualifications and receives the compensation set by the governing body. A member of the governing body may not be appointed manager of the municipality sooner than one year after leaving office, except by a vote of three-fourths of the authorized membership of the governing body.

Subject to the contract of employment, the manager holds office at the pleasure of the governing body.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.20.500.
Powers and duties of a manager.

The manager may hire necessary administrative assistants and may authorize an administrative official to appoint, suspend, or remove subordinates.
As chief administrator the manager shall

appoint, suspend, or remove municipal employees and administrative officials, except as provided otherwise in this title and AS

14.14.065

;

supervise the enforcement of municipal law and carry out the directives of the governing body;

prepare and submit an annual budget and capital improvement program for consideration by the governing body, and execute the budget and capital improvement program adopted;

make monthly financial reports and other reports on municipal finances and operations as required by the governing body;

exercise custody over all real and personal property of the municipality, except property of the school district;

perform other duties required by law or by the governing body; and

serve as personnel officer, unless the governing body authorizes the manager to appoint a personnel officer.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.20.510.
Intergovernmental appointment of manager.

A borough adopting a manager plan may, on agreement with a city in the borough, provide that the manager of the city serve also as borough manager.
A city adopting a manager plan may, on agreement with the borough in which it is located, provide that the manager of the borough serve also as city manager. Appointment and service of the manager shall be as provided in AS

29.20.490

—

29.20.500

.
Nothing in this section affects the authority of the governing body to provide for other dual officeholding if the dual offices held are compatible, or otherwise to appoint officials and employees in accordance with law.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.20.520.
Repeal of manager plan.

A municipality may repeal a manager plan by following the procedures under AS

29.20.460

—

29.20.480

for adoption of a manager plan, except the question shall be whether the manager plan should be repealed. Within 60 days after certification of the election approving repeal of a manager plan, the governing body shall enact provisions for the reorganization of the municipal executive and administrative functions.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 6 ch 80 SLA 1989)